Utah statutes.
53-5-711.   Law enforcement officials and judges -- Training requirements --
Qualification -- Revocation.
(1)  For purposes of this section and Section 76-10-523:
(a)  "Judge" means a judge or justice of a court of record or court not of
record, but does not include a judge pro tem or senior judge.
(b)  "Law enforcement official of this state" means:
(i)  a member of the Board of Pardons and Parole;
(ii)  a district attorney, deputy district attorney, county attorney or deputy
county attorney of a county not in a prosecution district;
(iii)  the attorney general;
(iv)  an assistant attorney general designated as a criminal prosecutor; or
(v)  a city attorney or a deputy city attorney designated as a criminal
prosecutor.
(2)  To qualify for the exemptions enumerated in Section 76-10-523, a law
enforcement official or judge shall complete the following training
requirements:
(a)  meet the requirements of Sections 53-5-704, 53-5-706, and 53-5-707; and
(b)  successfully complete an additional course of training as established by
the commissioner of public safety designed to assist them while carrying out
their official law enforcement and judicial duties as agents for the state or
its political subdivisions.
(3)  Annual requalification requirements for law enforcement officials and
judges shall be established by the:
(a)  Board of Pardons and Parole by rule for its members;
(b)  Judicial Council by rule for judges; and
(c)  the district attorney, county attorney in a county not in a prosecution
district, the attorney general, or city attorney by policy for prosecutors
under their jurisdiction.
(4)  The division may:
(a)  issue a certificate of qualification to a judge or law enforcement
official who has completed the requirements of Subsection (1), which
certificate of qualification is valid until revoked;
(b)  revoke the certificate of qualification of a judge or law enforcement
official who fails to meet the annual requalification criteria established
pursuant to Subsection (3); and
(c)  certify instructors for the training requirements of this section.
